North Dakota, session 69, SB2263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - MASTERY
FRAMEWORK TRAINING GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$500,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of public instruction,
for the purpose of providing mastery framework training grants, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. Grants must provide funding for school district teams
to be trained to develop and to apply policies and systems to implement mastery frameworks.
Model systems created must be shared across the state and the process may be replicated
locally. For grants under this section:
1. Up to $25,000 may be provided for each school district team. The funding may be
used for stipends for up to ten working days beyond the participant's contract with the
participant's school district and which are dedicated solely to mastery framework
training. Participants under twelve-month contracts with the participant's school district
may not receive a stipend. Funding may not be used for travel expenses.
2. Teams must include one administrator and, if available, one instructional coach.
3. Priority must be given to teams that are either preparing for, or have recently
completed leadership training or another training program approved by the
superintendent of public instruction.
4. Multiple applications may be submitted by a school district; however, no more than
$75,000 may be awarded to a school district.
5. The funding provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
Page No. 1 25.0582.02000